Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.505

Printing and distribution of publications—Authorized subject matters.

The department of labor and industries is specifically authorized to print, reprint, and distribute subject matter including but not limited to the following:

(1) The provisions of Title 51 RCW;

(2) The provisions of Title 49 RCW;

(3) The provisions of chapter 7.68 RCW;

(4) The provisions of chapter 88.16 RCW;

(5) The provisions of chapter 19.28 RCW;

(6) The provisions of chapter 43.22 RCW;

(7) The provisions of chapter 41.56 RCW;

(8) The provisions of chapter 49.66 RCW;

(9) The provisions of chapter 70.79 RCW;

(10) The provisions of chapter 70.74 RCW;

(11) The provisions of chapter 70.87 RCW;

(12) The provisions of all other statutes administered by the department or such statutes as have a relationship to the functions and obligations of the department; and

(13) The rules and regulations of the department of labor and industries, the state apprenticeship council, the state board of pilotage commissioners and the board of boiler rules promulgated pursuant to the statutory provisions cited above.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 123 s 2.]